Massachusetts, session 194th, H2697.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the contrary, non-
emergency aircraft flight training maneuvers are prohibited within a 2 nautical mile radius of
hospital helipads in the commonwealth. These areas should be avoided for simulated landings,
practice approaches, turns about a point, power off turns, and related maneuvers. Overflights of
such areas may not descend below 2,000 feet above ground level (AGL) and should be avoided.
Private flight schools and recreational pilots are not to consider these locations appropriate areas
to concentrate maneuvers due to public safety.
of 1